North Dakota, session 69, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Requests for legislation - Legislative council - Disclosure to caucus leader.
1. The legislative council shall disclose to the caucus leader of the requester's political
faction the topic of a request to the legislative council made by a member of the
legislative assembly for a draft bill or resolution or a revision to a draft bill or resolution
and the name of the requester.
2. A draft or revision of a draft bill or resolution drafted for a member of the legislative
assembly may be disclosed to the caucus leader of the requester's political faction,
unless the member of the legislative assembly elects to maintain the confidentiality of
the draft or revision of a draft bill or resolution with respect to the caucus leader of the
requester's political faction in the manner prescribed by the legislative council.
3. Records disclosed to the caucus leader of the requester's political faction under this
section are not subject to section 44 - 04 - 18 and section 6 of article XI of the
Constitution of North Dakota.
Page No. 1 25.0962.02000